California statutes. Financial Code
(3) Within a period longer than three business days of receipt, if the agent has previously deposited with, and during such period maintains on deposit with, an office of an insured bank or of an insured savings and loan association located in the United States in an account that is in the sole and exclusive name of the licensee an amount that, for each day by which such period exceeds three business days, is not less than the aggregate face amount of money received on behalf of the licensee for money transmission that the agent usually sells per day.

(4) Within such shorter period as the licensee may provide.

(f) An agent
 may not provide money transmission outside the scope of activity permissible under the contract between the agent and the licensee. All money or monetary value, less fees, received by an agent of a licensee shall, from the time when the money is received by the agent until the time when the money or an equivalent amount is remitted by the agent to the licensee, constitute trust funds owned by and belonging to the licensee.

(g) An agent may not use a subagent to conduct money transmissions on behalf of a licensee.

(h) Each licensee shall exercise reasonable supervision over its agents to ensure compliance with applicable laws, rules, and regulations with respect to money transmission.

(i) No agent of a licensee shall,
 nor shall any licensee cause or knowingly permit any of its agents to, conduct money transmission on behalf of the licensee without concurrently receiving money, monetary value or its equivalent, credit card, or payment instrument, or a combination of same believed to be valid in an amount not less than the amount of the money transmission being provided. In the case of a sale of payment instruments or stored value to an insured bank, an insured savings and loan association, or an insured credit union, the licensee or agents of the licensee may receive such amounts the next business day after the sale.

(j) If any agent of a licensee shall commingle any money or monetary value, less fees, received on behalf of the licensee for money transmission with any other property owned or controlled by the agent, all such property shall be impressed with a
 trust in favor of the licensee in an amount equal to the aggregate amount of such money so commingled. No money or monetary value, less fees, received by any agent on behalf of the licensee for money transmission, while held by such agent, nor any property impressed with a trust pursuant to this subdivision, shall be subject to attachment, levy of execution, or sequestration by order of any court, except for the benefit of the licensee.

(k) Each licensee shall be liable as a principal for the money or monetary value from the time when the money or monetary value is received by the agent. Each licensee shall be liable as the maker or drawer on each payment instrument issued or sold by such licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 356, Sec. 16.   (SB 979)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2061.

(a) No licensee shall appoint any person as an agent unless it has conducted a review of the proposed agent’s fitness to act as an agent and has determined that the proposed agent and any persons who control the proposed agent are of good character and sound financial standing.

(b) A licensee shall maintain records of this review for each agent while the agent is providing money transmission on behalf of
 the licensee, and for three years after the relationship with the agent has terminated.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 4.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2062.

A person may not provide money transmissions on behalf of a person not licensed or not exempt from licensure under this division. A person that engages in that activity provides money transmissions services to the same extent as if the person was a licensee, and shall be jointly and severally liable with the unlicensed or nonexempt person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 356, Sec. 17.   (SB 979)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2063.

(a) No agent of a licensee who has actual notice that the commissioner has suspended or revoked the license of the licensee or that the commissioner has issued an order taking possession of the property and business of the licensee shall conduct money transmission on behalf of the licensee.

(b) If any agent of a licensee, after first having actual notice that the commissioner has suspended or revoked the
 license of the licensee or that the commissioner has issued an order taking possession of the property and business of the licensee, conducts money transmission on behalf of the licensee, the agent shall be jointly and severally liable with the licensee for payment of the money transmission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 4.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Eligible Securities [2081. - 2089.]

2081.

(a) A licensee shall at all times own eligible securities having an aggregate market value computed in accordance with United States generally accepted accounting principles of not less than the aggregate amount of all of its outstanding payment instruments and stored value obligations issued or sold in the United States and all outstanding money received for transmission in the United States.

(b) If the
 commissioner finds that the financial condition of a licensee is impaired, or that the financial condition of a licensee is such that its business is being conducted in an unsafe and unsound manner, the commissioner, to protect the public interest, may issue an order, subject to the procedures set forth in Section 2148, doing one or both of the following:

(1) Increasing the amount of eligible securities that the licensee must maintain.

(2) Requiring the licensee to obtain, as security for the payment of outstanding money transmission obligations, additional security in the form of financial guarantees.

(c) Eligible securities, even if commingled with other assets of the licensee, are deemed to be held in trust for the benefit of the purchasers and holders of the licensee’s outstanding payment instrument and stored
 value obligations, and all senders of outstanding money received for transmission, in the event of bankruptcy or receivership of the licensee, or in the event of an action by a creditor against the licensee who is not a beneficiary of this statutory trust. No eligible securities impressed with a trust pursuant to this subdivision shall be subject to attachment, levy of execution, or sequestration by order of any court, except for a beneficiary of this statutory trust.

(d) All outstanding payment instruments and stored value issued or sold by a licensee or its agent, and all outstanding money received for transmission by a licensee or its agent, shall remain a liability of the licensee from the time money or monetary value is received by the licensee or its agent until the licensee receives confirmation that such money or monetary value was received by the beneficiary, or until the outstanding payment instrument or stored value obligation has
 been paid, or until the money is refunded to the customer.

(e) A licensee shall maintain a record in the United States of proof of receipt by the beneficiary or refund to the customer of money received for transmission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 4.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2082.

(a) “Eligible security” means any United States currency eligible security or foreign currency eligible security.

(b) For the purposes of this division, the following are United States currency eligible securities:

(1) Cash, cash in transit via armored car, cash in smart safes, and cash in licensee-owned locations.

(2) Any deposit in an insured bank, an insured savings and loan association, or an insured credit union, including any deposit in an insured bank, an insured savings and loan association, or an insured credit union that is in an account held for the benefit of the licensee’s customers that is titled “(name of licensee) FBO Its
 (licensee’s customers or specific group of licensee’s customers).”

(3) Any bond, note, or other obligation that is issued or is guaranteed by the United States or any agency of the United States.

(4) Any bond, note, or other obligation that is issued or guaranteed by any state of the United States or by any governmental agency of or within any state of the United States and that is assigned an eligible rating by an eligible securities rating service.

(5) Any bankers acceptance that is eligible for discount by a federal reserve bank.

(6) Any commercial paper that is assigned an eligible rating by an eligible rating securities service.

(7) Any bond, note, or other obligation that is assigned
 an eligible rating by an eligible securities rating service.

(8) Any share of an investment company that is an open-end management company, that is registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 80a-1 et seq.), that holds itself out to investors as a money market fund, and that operates in accordance with all provisions of the Investment Company Act of 1940, and the regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission applicable to money market funds, including Section 270.2a-7 of the regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission (17 C.F.R. 270.2a-7).

For purposes of this paragraph and paragraph (9), “investment company,” “management company,” and “open-end” have the meanings set forth in Sections 3, 4, and 5, respectively, of the Investment Company Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. Secs. 80a-4 and 80a-5, respectively).

(9) Any share of an investment company that is an open-end management company, that is registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 80a-1 et seq.), and that invests exclusively in securities that constitute eligible securities that comply with the valuation requirements of this division.

(10) Any account due to any licensee from any agent in the United States on account of the receipt of money on behalf of the licensee for money transmission by the agent, if the account is current and not past due or otherwise doubtful of collection.

(11) Any other security or class of securities that the commissioner has by regulation or order declared to be eligible securities.

(12) Any receivable owed by a bank and resulting from a debit card- or credit card-funded transmission, automated
 clearinghouse items in transit to the licensee, and automated clearinghouse items or international wires in transit to a payee.

(13) The full drawable amount of an irrevocable standby letter of credit for which the stated beneficiary is the commissioner that stipulates that the beneficiary need only draw a sight draft under the letter of credit and present it to obtain funds up to the letter of credit amount within seven days of presentation of the items required by subparagraph (B).

(A) The letter of credit described by this paragraph shall meet all of the following criteria:

(i) The letter of credit is issued by an insured depository financial institution, a foreign bank that is authorized under federal law to maintain a federal agency or federal branch office in any state, or a foreign bank that is authorized
 under state law to maintain a branch in a state that bears an eligible rating or whose parent company bears an eligible rating and that is regulated, supervised, and examined by United States federal or state authorities having regulatory authority over banks, credit unions, and trust companies.

(ii) The letter of credit is irrevocable, unconditional, and indicates that it is not subject to any condition or qualifications outside of the letter of credit.

(iii) The letter of credit does not contain reference to any other agreements, documents, or entities, or otherwise provide for any security interest in the licensee.

(iv) (I) The letter of credit contains an issue date and expiration date and expressly provides for automatic extension, without a written amendment, for an additional period of
 one year from the present or each future expiration date, unless the issuer of the letter of credit notifies the commissioner in writing by certified or registered mail or courier mail or other receipted means, at least 60 days before any expiration date, that the irrevocable letter of credit will not be extended.

(II) If the issuer notifies, pursuant to subclause (I), the commissioner that a letter of credit will not be extended, the licensee shall demonstrate to the satisfaction of the commissioner at least 15 days before expiration that the licensee maintains, and will maintain, permissible investments in accordance with Section 2081 upon the expiration of the letter of credit. If the licensee is not able to do so, the commissioner may draw on the letter of credit in an amount up to the amount necessary to meet the licensee’s requirements to maintain permissible investments in accordance with Section 2081. Any such draw shall be offset
 against the licensee’s outstanding money transmission obligations. The drawn funds shall be held in trust by the commissioner or the commissioner’s designated agent, to the extent authorized by law, as agent for the benefit of the purchasers and holders of the licensee’s outstanding money transmission obligations.

(B) The letter of credit shall provide that the issuer of the letter of credit will honor, at sight, a presentation made, on or before the expiration date of the letter of credit, by the beneficiary to the issuer of both of the following documents:

(i) The original letter of credit, including any amendments.

(ii) A written statement from the beneficiary stating that any of the following events have occurred:

(I) The filing of a petition by or
 against the licensee under Sections 101 to 110, inclusive, of Title 11 of the United States Code, as amended or recodified from time to time, for bankruptcy or reorganization.

(II) The filing of a petition by or against the licensee for receivership or the commencement of any other judicial or administrative proceeding for its dissolution or reorganization.

(III) The seizure of assets of a licensee by a commissioner pursuant to an emergency order issued in accordance with applicable law on the basis of an action, violation, or condition that has caused, or is likely to cause, the insolvency of the licensee.

(IV) The beneficiary has received notice of expiration or non-extension of a letter of credit, and the licensee failed to demonstrate to the satisfaction of the beneficiary that the licensee will maintain
 permissible investments in accordance with Section 2081 upon the expiration or non-extension of the letter of credit.

(C) (i) The letter of credit shall authorize the commissioner to designate an agent to serve on the commissioner’s behalf as beneficiary to a letter of credit if the agent and letter of credit meet requirements established by the commissioner.

 (ii) An agent designated pursuant to this subparagraph may serve as agent for multiple licensing authorities for a single irrevocable letter of credit if the proceeds of the drawable amount for the purposes of this section are assigned to the commissioner.

(c) “Foreign currency eligible security” means any of the following that is denominated in a foreign currency:

(1) Cash.

(2) Any deposit, made with the prior approval of the commissioner, in an office of a bank that is located in a foreign country, if the licensee has received a satisfactory rating in its most recent examination, and the foreign depository institution meets all of the following criteria:

(A) The foreign depository institution has an eligible rating.

(B) The foreign depository institution is registered under the federal Foreign Account Tax Compliance Act.

(C) The foreign depository institution is not located in a country subject to sanctions from the federal Office of Foreign Asset Control.

(D) The foreign depository institution is not located in a high-risk or
 non-cooperative jurisdiction as designated by the Financial Action Task Force.

(3) Any other security or class of securities that the commissioner has by regulation or order declared to be eligible securities pursuant to Section 2086.

(d) For the purposes of this division, “value” means the following:

(1) When used with respect to an eligible security owned by a licensee of the type described in paragraph (10) of subdivision (b), net carrying value as determined in conformity with United States generally accepted accounting principles. However, in computing the value of the account, any amount that consists of money that has not been remitted to the licensee or refunded within 45 business days of receipt by the agent shall be excluded from the value of the account and shall be excluded from the calculation of
 eligible securities.

(2) Market value when used with respect to any other eligible security owned by a licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 463, Sec. 7.   (AB 1116)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2083.

(a) In computing, for purposes of Section 2082, the aggregate value of eligible securities owned by a licensee, all of the following shall be excluded:

(1) The value of any eligible security if and to the extent that the value of the eligible security, when combined with the aggregate value of all other eligible securities owned by the licensee that are issued or guaranteed by the same person or by any affiliate of the same person by whom the eligible security is issued or guaranteed, exceeds 10 percent of the aggregate value of all eligible securities owned by the licensee.

(2) (A) Subject to subparagraph (B), the portion of the aggregate value of all eligible securities of the
 type described in paragraph (10) of subdivision (b) of Section 2082 that exceeds 25 percent of the aggregate value of all eligible securities owned by the licensee; and that portion of the aggregate value of agent receivables from any one person that exceeds 10 percent of the aggregate value of all eligible securities owned by the licensee, or any higher percentage that the commissioner may approve for the licensee, up to a maximum of 20 percent.

(B) If the receivable due from an agent is less than seven days old, then that portion of the aggregate value of all eligible securities of the type described in paragraph (10) of subdivision (b) of Section 2082 that exceeds 50 percent of the aggregate value of all eligible securities owned by the licensee.

(3) The portion of the aggregate value of all eligible securities of the type described in paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) of
 Section 2082 that exceeds 20 percent of the aggregate value of all eligible securities owned by the licensee.

(4) The portion of the aggregate value of all eligible securities of the type described in paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 2082 that exceeds 20 percent of the aggregate value of all eligible securities owned by the licensee.

(5) (A) The portion of the aggregate value of all eligible securities of the type described in paragraph (8) of subdivision (b) of Section 2082 that exceeds 20 percent of the aggregate value of all eligible securities owned by the licensee.

(B) This paragraph does not apply to either of the following:

(i) A money market fund that invests exclusively in obligations issued or guaranteed by the
 United States or any agency of the United States.

(ii) A money market fund rated AAA by Standard & Poor’s Corporation or the equivalent rating from any eligible rating service.

(6) The portion of the aggregate value of all eligible securities of the type described in paragraphs (6), (7), and (8) of subdivision (b) of Section 2082 that exceeds 50 percent of the aggregate value of all eligible securities owned by the licensee.

(7) The portion of the aggregate value of all eligible securities of the type described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 2082 that exceeds 10 percent of the aggregate value of all eligible securities owned by the licensee.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not be deemed to require the exclusion of the value of any of the
 following eligible securities, and each of the following eligible securities shall be exempted from the limitations of subdivision (a):

(1) The following eligible securities:

(A) Cash.

(B) Any deposit in an insured bank, insured savings and loan association, or insured credit union.

(C) Any bond, note, or other obligation for the payment of which the full faith and credit of the United States are pledged.

(2) Any eligible security that the commissioner, in view of the financial condition of the obligor or issuer and such other factors as may in the opinion of the commissioner be relevant, finds to be of such quality that exclusion of the value of such eligible security pursuant to
 subdivision (a) is not necessary for the purposes of this division and which the commissioner by regulation or order exempts, in whole or in part, from the limitations of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 463, Sec. 8.   (AB 1116)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2084.

(a) A licensee shall be deemed to own an eligible security only if the following apply:

(1) (A) The licensee owns the eligible security solely and exclusively in its own right, both of record and beneficially.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a licensee shall be deemed to own accounts held for the benefit of the licensee’s customers that otherwise meet the requirements of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 2082.

(2) The eligible security is not subject to any pledge, lien, or security interest.

(3) The licensee can freely negotiate, assign,
 or otherwise transfer the eligible security.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a licensee shall not be deemed not to own an eligible security solely on account of either of the following facts, provided that, but for that fact, the licensee would be deemed to own the eligible security under the provisions of subdivision (a):

(1) The fact that the eligible security is owned of record by a documented nominee of the licensee or by a securities depository.

(2) The fact that the licensee has pledged the eligible security with the United States or any state of the United States to secure payment by the licensee of transmission money.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 463, Sec. 9.   (AB 1116)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2085.

If the commissioner finds that any eligible security or class of eligible securities is not of sufficient liquidity or quality to be eligible securities, the commissioner may by regulation or order declare the security or class of securities to be ineligible.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 4.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2086.

If the commissioner finds that any security or class of securities that is not an eligible security is of sufficient liquidity and quality to be an eligible security, the commissioner may by regulation or order declare the security or class of securities to be eligible securities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 4.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2087.

(a) If the commissioner finds that a rating assigned to a class of securities by an eligible securities rating service indicates that the class of securities is of sufficient quality to be eligible securities, the commissioner may by regulation or order declare the rating to be an eligible rating.

(b) With respect to this division “eligible rating” means any rating assigned to such security or class of securities by such eligible securities rating service which the commissioner has by regulation or order declared to be an eligible rating.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 356, Sec. 20.   (SB 979)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2088.

(a) The commissioner may by regulation or order declare a credit rating agency to be an eligible securities rating service if the commissioner finds the following with respect to the securities rating service:

(1) It has been continuously engaged in the business of rating securities for a period of not less than three years.

(2) It is competent to rate securities and is nationally recognized for rating securities in a competent manner.

(3) It publishes its ratings of securities on a nationwide basis.

(b) With respect to this division
 “eligible securities rating service” means any credit rating agency that the commissioner by regulation or order declared to be an eligible securities ratings service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 499, Sec. 11.   (AB 2209)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2089.

A licensee shall maintain eligible securities that are adequately diversified, predominantly of a duration commensurate with the licensee’s outstanding money transmission obligations, and of sufficient liquidity and quality to promptly pay the outstanding money transmission obligations of the licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 4.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Consumer Disclosures [2100. - 2107.]

2100.

(a) (1) Each licensee shall file with the commissioner a certified copy of every receipt form used by it or by its agent for receiving money for transmission prior to its first use. No licensee or its agent shall use any receipt, a certified copy of which has not been filed with the commissioner, or use a receipt that the commissioner has deemed not to be in compliance pursuant to paragraph (2).

(2) If the commissioner determines, within 30 business days of the filing date of a receipt, that the receipt does not comply with the requirements of this section or Sections 2102 and 2103, the commissioner shall notify the licensee in writing that the receipt is
 not in compliance with those requirements.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), before a new licensee issues its first receipt to a customer, it shall file with the commissioner a certified copy of the receipt forms to be used by it or its agents for receiving money for transmission. The new licensee shall not use the receipt forms until approved by the commissioner. For purposes of this subdivision, a new licensee is a licensee that has not been previously licensed by the commissioner as a money transmitter or has not previously received money for transmission in California.

(c) If a receipt is required by this division to be in English and another language, the English version of the receipt shall govern any dispute concerning the terms of the receipt. However, any discrepancies
 between the English version and any other version due to the translation of the receipt from English to another language including errors or ambiguities shall be construed against the licensee or its agent and the licensee or its agent shall be liable for any damages caused by these discrepancies.

(d) Any licensee violating the requirements of this section shall be subject to a fine of fifty dollars ($50) for each violation. This provision is in addition to any other enforcement provisions that may apply to such a violation.

(e) If any licensee or its agent uses a receipt form, a certified copy of which has not been filed with the commissioner, the licensee shall be liable for the acts of its agent whether or not the licensee authorized the agent to use that form.

(f) The receipt form shall comply with the requirements of Sections 2102 and 2103.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 356, Sec. 22.   (SB 979)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2101.

Every licensee or its agent shall forward all money received for transmission or give instructions committing equivalent money to the person designated by the customer. Unless the transmission is for the payment of goods or services or unless otherwise ordered by his or her customer, this requirement shall be satisfied within 10 days after receiving that money.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 533, Sec. 7.   (AB 786)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2102.

(a) Every licensee or its agent shall refund to the customer within 10 days of receipt of the customer’s written request for a refund any and all money received for transmission unless any of the following occurs:

(1) The money has been forwarded within 10 days of the date of receipt.

(2) Instructions have been given committing an equivalent amount of money to the person designated by the customer within 10 days of the date of the receipt of the money from the customer.

(3) The customer instructs the licensee to transmit the money at a time beyond 10 days. If the customer gives instructions as to
 when the money shall be forwarded or transmitted and the moneys have not yet been forwarded or transmitted, the licensee or its agent shall refund the customer’s money within 10 days of receipt of the customer’s written request for a refund.

(4) The refund would violate law.

(b) If a customer’s instructions as to when the money shall be forwarded or transmitted are not complied with and the money has not yet been forwarded or transmitted, the customer has a right to a refund of his or her money. A cause of action under this section may be brought in small claims court if it does not exceed the jurisdiction of that court, or in any other appropriate court. The customer shall be entitled to recover each of the following:

(1) Any and all money received for transmission, plus any fees and charges paid by the
 customer.

(2) A penalty in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000). The court shall award the prevailing party costs and attorney’s fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 499, Sec. 12.   (AB 2209)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2103.

(a) In the case of money received for transmission, the licensee or its agent shall give the customer a receipt at the time of the transaction.

(1) The receipt shall contain the following information, as applicable:

(A) The name of the sender.

(B) The name of the designated recipient.

(C) The date of the transaction, which is the day the customer funds the money transmission.

(D) The name of the licensee.

(E) The amount to be transferred to the designated recipient, in the currency in which the money transmission is funded, using the term “Transfer Amount” or a substantially similar term.

(F) Any fees and taxes imposed on the money transmission by the licensee or its agent that are payable or have been paid by the sender, in the currency in which the money transmission is funded, using the terms “transfer fees” for fees and “transfer taxes” for taxes, or substantially similar terms.

(G) The total amount of the transaction, which is the sum of subparagraphs (E) and (F), in the currency in which the money transmission is funded, using the term “total” or a substantially similar term.

(H) The exchange rate, if any, used by the licensee or its agent for the money transmission, rounded consistently for each currency to no fewer than two decimal places and no more than four decimal places, using the term “exchange rate” or a substantially similar term.

(I) For all transmissions, other than transmissions related to e-commerce transactions, the amount that will be received by the designated recipient, in the currency in which the funds will be received, using the term “total to recipient” or a substantially similar term. For transmissions related to e-commerce transactions, the amount that will be received by the designated recipient before any fees, taxes, or other amounts payable by the designated recipient are deducted, using the term “total to recipient” or a substantially similar term. These fees, taxes, or
 other amounts shall be disclosed to the designated recipient. The disclosure of fees, taxes, or other amounts payable by the designated recipient, which need not be disclosed to the sender, shall be disclosed as part of a separate written agreement between the licensee and the designated recipient.

(J) For receipts issued on or after July 1, 2022, a telephone number through which the customer may contact the licensee pursuant to Section 2107.

(2) (A) In addition to the disclosures set forth in paragraph (1), the receipt shall either include or have attached a conspicuous statement as follows:
“RIGHT TO REFUNDYou, the customer, are entitled to a refund of the money to be transmitted as the result of this agreement if _____ (name of licensee) does not forward the money received from you within 10 days of the date of its receipt, or does not give instructions committing an equivalent amount of money to the person designated by you within 10 days of the date of the receipt of the funds from you unless otherwise instructed by you.If your instructions as to when the moneys shall be forwarded or transmitted are not complied with and the money has not yet been forwarded or transmitted, you have a right to a refund of your money.If you want a refund, you must mail or deliver your
 written request to _____ (name of licensee) at _____ (mailing address of licensee). If you do not receive your refund, you may be entitled to your money back plus a penalty of up to $1,000 and attorney’s fees pursuant to Section 2102 of the California Financial Code.”
(B) The right to refund statement set forth in subparagraph (A) is not required to be included on receipts involving e-commerce transactions where the customer sends a payment for goods or services.

(3) The receipt required by this section shall be made in English and in the language principally used by that licensee or that agent to advertise, solicit, or negotiate, either orally or in writing, at that branch office, if other than
 English. For transactions that do not occur in a branch office, the receipt shall be made in English and in the language principally used by that licensee or that agent to advertise, solicit, or negotiate money transmission, either orally or in writing.

(4) The receipt required by this subdivision may be provided electronically for transactions that are initiated electronically or in which a customer agrees to receive an electronic receipt.

(5) Disclosures in the receipt required by this subdivision shall be in a minimum 8-point type, except for receipts provided via mobile phone or text message.

(b) If window and exterior signs concerning the rates of exchange for money received for transmission are used, they shall clearly
 state in English and in the same language principally used by the licensee or any agent of the licensee to advertise, solicit, or negotiate, either orally or in writing, at that branch office if other than English, the rate of exchange for exchanging the currency of the United States for foreign currency. If an interior sign or any advertising is used that quotes exchange rates, it shall, in addition to clearly stating the rates of exchange for exchanging the currency of the United States for foreign currency, also state all commissions and fees charged on all such transactions.

(c) At each branch office, there shall be disclosed the exchange
 rates, fees, and commissions charged in English and in the same language principally used by the licensee or any agent of the licensee to advertise, solicit, or negotiate, either orally or in writing, with respect to money received for transmission at that branch office. At each branch office, there shall be signage clearly identifying the name of the licensee as well as any trade names used by the licensee at that branch office. In the event that a licensee or agent conducts money transmission activity via an internet website or mobile application that is not in a branch office, the commissioner may authorize an alternative disclosure meeting the requirements of this section. Any internet website through which a licensee conducts money transmission shall clearly identify the name of the licensee as well as any trade names used by the licensee on the internet website.

(d) If the customer does not specify at the time the money is presented to the licensee or its agent the country to which the money is to be transmitted, the rate of exchange for the transaction is not required to be set forth on the receipt. If the customer does specify at the time the money is presented to the licensee or its agent the country to which the money is to be transmitted but the specified country’s laws require the rate of exchange for the transaction to be determined at the time the transaction is paid out to the intended recipient, the rate of exchange for the transaction is not required to be set forth on the receipt.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 46.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2104.

Each licensee or agent shall prominently post on the premises of each branch office that issues or sells payment instruments, and at machines located in this state and operated by the licensee or agent that issues or sells payment instruments, a notice clearly stating that payment instruments are not insured by the federal government, the state government, or any other public or private entity. This notice shall be printed in English and in the same language principally used by the
 licensee or any agent of the licensee to advertise, solicit, or negotiate, either orally or in writing, with respect to the purchase of payment instruments. The information required in this notice shall be clear, legible, and in letters not less than one-half inch in height. The notice shall be posted in a conspicuous location in the unobstructed view of the public within the premises. The licensee shall provide to each of its agents the notice required by this section. In those locations operated by an agent, the agent, not the licensee, shall be responsible for the failure to properly post the required notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 4.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2105.

(a) Each licensee or agent shall prominently post on the premises of each branch office that conducts money transmission a notice stating that:“If you have complaints with respect to any aspect of the money transmission activities conducted at this location, you may contact the California Department of Financial Protection and Innovation at its toll-free telephone number, 1-866-275-2677, by email at consumer.services@dfpi.ca.gov, or by mail at the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation, Consumer Services,
 651 Bannon Street, Suite 300, Sacramento, CA 95811.”

(b) The commissioner may by order or regulation modify the content of the notice required by this section. This notice shall be printed in English and in the same language principally used by the licensee or any agent of the licensee to advertise, solicit, or negotiate either orally or in writing, with respect to money transmission at that branch office. The information required in this notice shall be clear, legible, and in letters not less than one-half inch in height. The notice shall be posted in a conspicuous location